Louisiana, session 2026, SB441.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:11(B), 24.8(A), (B), and (D)(1), 407.33(1) and (5), 407.35(A),
407.41(A), (B)(2) and (3), and (C) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 17:24.8(E)
and 407.41(D), (E), and (F) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§11. Approval of nonpublic schools by board
* * *
B.(1) The board shall approve any nonpublic elementary or secondary school
which makes application therefor on a form furnished by the board, if such school
meets and maintains a sustained curriculum or specialized course of study of quality
at least equal to that prescribed for similar public schools.
(2) The board shall approve a prekindergarten program developed by
a nonpublic school pursuant to R.S. 17:24.8 if the program meets the
requirements of this Subsection and maintains substantial compliance with the
child safety and welfare standards provided for in R.S. 17:407.41. In its annual
application, each nonpublic school shall attest to the prekindergarten program's
compliance with the child safety and welfare standards.
* * *
§24.8. Prekindergarten programs
Page 1 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 441 ENROLLED
A.(1) Each city, parish, or other local public school board may develop and
offer prekindergarten instruction. The youngest age at which a child may enter
prekindergarten provided for by this Subsection Paragraph shall be four years old
by September thirtieth of the year in which the child enrolls in prekindergarten.
(2) All public prekindergarten programs shall comply with the child safety
and welfare minimum standards provided for in R.S. 17:407.41. The governing
authority of any approved nonpublic elementary school may develop and offer
prekindergarten instruction. The youngest age at which a child may enter
prekindergarten provided for by this Paragraph shall be three years old by
September thirtieth of the year in which the child enrolls in prekindergarten.
(3) Any parent who chooses to enroll his child in a prekindergarten
program authorized pursuant to this Subsection shall be provided the following
information:
(a) The prekindergarten program is operated by a school.
(b) The prekindergarten program is not either of the following:
(i) Subject to federal daycare regulations pursuant to 45 CFR 98, or its
successor.
(ii) Licensed by the department as an early learning center in accordance
with the provisions of R.S. 17:407.31 et seq.
(c) The monitoring and complaint processes as provided in R.S.
17:407.41 for compliance with the child safety and welfare standards.
B. Except as otherwise provided by law, all prekindergarten programs
shall comply with the child safety and welfare standards provided for in R.S.
17:407.41.
(1) The governing authority of any approved nonpublic elementary school
may develop and offer prekindergarten instruction. The youngest age at which a
child may enter prekindergarten provided for by this Subsection shall be three years
old by September thirtieth of the year in which the child enrolls in prekindergarten.
If a public prekindergarten program demonstrates persistent or egregious
noncompliance with the child safety and welfare standards provided for in R.S.
Page 2 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 441 ENROLLED
17:407.41, a city, parish, or other local public school board shall consider
closure of the program or other measures deemed necessary to protect the
safety and welfare of prekindergarten children enrolled in the program at a
meeting held in accordance with the Open Meetings Law, R.S. 42:11 et seq.
(2) All nonpublic prekindergarten programs shall be licensed as an early
learning center pursuant to Part X-B of this Chapter. Notwithstanding the
provisions of R.S. 17:11(B)(2), if a nonpublic school operating a
prekindergarten program demonstrates persistent or egregious noncompliance
with the child safety and welfare standards provided for in R.S. 17:407.41, the
department shall make a recommendation to the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education to deny the approval request for a prekindergarten
program for the subsequent school year unless substantive assurance is
provided by the school that it will comply with the child safety and welfare
standards.
* * *
D.(1) Beginning with the 2023-2024 school year, each city, parish, or other
local public school board shall work to develop a mixed provider delivery model for
full-day, year-round, high-quality prekindergarten instruction to each child residing
within the boundaries of the school district who is eligible for a prekindergarten
program pursuant to Subsection A Paragraph (A)(1) of this Section.
* * *
E. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education, in
consultation with the Nonpublic School Commission, shall adopt rules and
regulations to protect the health and safety of three-year-old children who
attend prekindergarten at an approved nonpublic elementary school.
* * *
§407.33. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the following meanings unless
the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Camp" means any place or facility operated by any institution, society,
Page 3 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 441 ENROLLED
agency, corporation, person or persons, or any other group which meets any of the
following:
(a) serves Serves only children five three years of age or older and operates
only when school is not in session during the summer months or school holidays
including but not limited to a Vacation Bible School or Bible Camp.
(b) Is a tax exempt church or religious organization in accordance with
26 U.S.C. 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code that operates a Vacation Bible
School, Bible Camp, or religious camp for children of any age.
(c) Operates only an after-school or weekend extracurricular, academic,
or athletic program, including any competition related to the program, or an
after-school or weekend tutoring program or other educational or enrichment
program authorized by this Title.
* * *
(5) "Early learning center" means any child day care center, Early Head Start
Center, Head Start Center, or nonpublic prekindergarten program stand-alone early
learning program that is not part of an elementary school as defined in R.S.
17:236.
* * *
§407.35. Exemptions from licensure requirements
A. The provisions of this Part shall not apply to grades kindergarten and
above, prekindergarten programs attached to a nonpublic or public day school
serving children in grades kindergarten and above, Louisiana Montessori
accredited or provisionally accredited approved schools, camps, registered family
child day care homes, mother's day out programs, and care given without charge.
However, all school prekindergarten programs shall comply with the child safety and
welfare minimum standards provided for in R.S. 17:407.41.
* * *
§407.41. Child safety and welfare minimum standards
A. In addition to regulations promulgated by the State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education pursuant to R.S. 17:407.40, all early learning centers and
Page 4 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 441 ENROLLED
All school prekindergarten programs established pursuant to R.S. 17:24.8 shall,
at a minimum, meet the following minimum standards to ensure the safety and
welfare of children:
(1) There shall be a minimum of two staff members present at any facility
when more than four children are present, except under an extenuating circumstance
that temporarily prevents compliance with this Paragraph.
(2) The child-to-staff ratios shall not exceed the following:
(a) Infants and under one year - 5 to 1
(b) One year - 7 to 1
(c) Two years - 10 to 1
(d) Three years - 13 to 1
(e) Four years - 15 to 1
(f) Five years - 19 to 1
(a) The child-to-staff ratios shall be in compliance with those set in rules
that the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall adopt for
this purpose. The rules shall provide ratio requirements for prekindergarten
students who are three years old, four years old, and five years old in order to
provide for the health, safety, and welfare of those students. Both public and
nonpublic schools operating prekindergarten programs shall comply with the
ratio requirements provided in these rules.
(b) The rules may be waived if the state board determines, upon clear
and convincing evidence, that the demonstrated economic impact is sufficiently
great to make compliance impractical for the school despite diligent efforts, and
that alternative means have been put in place that ensure the health, safety, and
well-being of students and staff.
(3) An average of the child-to-staff ratios may be applied to mixed age
groups of children only for groups that include no children under the age of two.
(4) When a mixed age group includes children younger than age two, the age
of the youngest child determines the child-to-staff ratio for the group.
(5)When the nature of a child with special healthcare needs or the number of
Page 5 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 441 ENROLLED
children with special healthcare needs warrants added care, the center shall add
sufficient staff as necessary.
(6) Only staff members directly providing care, supervision, or guidance to
children shall be counted in the child-to-staff ratio. The same staff members shall not
be used to meet the ratio requirements for two different groups of children at the
same time.
(7) Sufficient staffing needed to satisfy child-to-staff ratios shall be present
on the premises during rest time and available to assist as needed. Children ages one
and older may be grouped together at rest time with one staff member in each room
supervising the resting children.
(8) Information regarding required child-to-staff ratios and a phone number
to file complaints regarding supervision with the Department of Education, as
applicable, shall be posted in each classroom in a location that is visible to parents.
(9)(5) Children shall be supervised at all times including on the playground,
on field trips, and on nonvehicular excursions.
(10)(6)(a) Children shall not be left alone in any room, outdoors, or in
vehicles, even momentarily, without staff present.
(b) The provisions of this Paragraph shall not apply to restroom use as
provided in this Section, if a child is being provided services by therapeutic
professionals, or if a child is in the custody of a parent or legal guardian.
(11)(7) A staff person shall be assigned to supervise specific children whose
names and whereabouts that the staff person shall know and with whom the staff
person shall be physically present. Staff shall be able to state how many children are
in their care at all times.
(12)(8)(a) A child who is developmentally able may be permitted to use the
restroom independently if a staff member is in proximity to and can see the child to
ensure immediate intervention to safeguard a child from harm or to assist with an
accident while in the restroom.
(b) An individual who is not a staff member may not enter the restroom area
while in use by any child other than his own child.
Page 6 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 441 ENROLLED
(13)(9) A child age five and older may be permitted to go to and return from
the restroom without staff.
(14)(10) If a prekindergarten program or early learning center is part of a
school with children in kindergarten or older, staff shall ensure that the children
enrolled in the prekindergarten program or early learning center are not unsupervised
in the restroom at the same time as any older children who are using the restroom.
For any facility constructed after January 1, 2026, there shall be designated separate
restrooms for the children enrolled in the prekindergarten program or early learning
center.
(15)(11) Children shall be changed and cleaned immediately following a
toileting accident.
B. * * *
(2) The state Department of Education shall provide the document to each
early learning center and prekindergarten program no later than August first of each
year.
(3) Each early learning center and public school with a prekindergarten
program shall distribute the document to the parents and legal guardians of all
children enrolled in an early learning center or the prekindergarten program.
* * *
C. The state Department of Education shall provide written notification to the
superintendent of a school district or the governing authority of a nonpublic or
charter school for any complaint received by the department regarding a
prekindergarten program in the school or district pursuant to this Section.
D.(1) The state Department of Education shall conduct monitoring
activities for compliance with the child safety and welfare standards as provided
in this Section. Monitoring activities shall include an annual unannounced site
visit and prompt response to reports of noncompliance with the child safety and
welfare standards.
(2) Any violation of the child safety and welfare standards provided in
this Section shall be documented by the department. The documentation shall
Page 7 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 441 ENROLLED
include the specific standard violated and any corrective action taken and shall
be posted on the corresponding school page of the department's website.
(3) The department may issue a written warning to a school, which may
include a corrective action plan, for any violation of this Section if the violation
does not pose an imminent threat to the health, safety, rights, or welfare of a
child.
E.(1) A nonpublic school approved by the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education as an accredited approved school shall be exempt from
the provisions of Subsection D of this Section if all of the following conditions
apply:
(a) The school maintains accreditation in good standing with an
accreditation organization recognized by the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education for the purpose of school approval.
(b) The accrediting organization's standards include provisions
addressing the supervision, health, safety, and welfare of students enrolled in
a prekindergarten program operated by the accredited approved school that
meet or exceed the child safety and welfare standards as provided in this
Section.
(c) The school provides a written attestation to the state Department of
Education, at the time of its annual school approval application, that the
accrediting organization's standards meet or exceed the child safety and welfare
standards provided for in this Section and provides documentation from the
accrediting organization supporting the attestation.
(2)(a) A nonpublic school approved by the State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education as a nonaccredited approved school shall be exempt
from the provisions of Subsection D of this Section if either of the following
conditions are met:
(i) All of the following criteria are met:
(aa) The school remains a member in good standing with an association
or organization recognized by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Page 8 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 441 ENROLLED
Education for the purposes of this Section.
(bb) The association or organization's standards include provisions
addressing the supervision, health, safety, and welfare of students enrolled in
a prekindergarten program operated by the school that meet or exceed the child
safety and welfare standards provided for in this Section.
(cc) The school provides a written attestation to the state Department of
Education, at the same time of its annual school approval application, that the
association or organization's standards meet or exceed the child safety and
welfare standards provided for in this Section and provides documentation
from the association or organization supporting the attestation.
(ii) The state Department of Education recommends that approval be
granted after an annual review that the department shall conduct of each school
seeking approval. The annual review may include site visits and shall include
a review, at minimum, of the health, safety, and welfare of prekindergarten
students.
(b) For the 2026-2027 school year, if an association or organization has
submitted a complete application for recognition to the state board and the state
board has not acted upon the application prior to the beginning of the 2026-
2027 school year, the department shall accept the attestation submitted by the
school.
(3) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education may revoke
its approval of a prekindergarten program operated by a nonpublic school at
any time if the board determines that the school has jeopardized the health,
safety, or welfare of its students.
F.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any school,
including a nonpublic school approved by the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education or a prekindergarten program attached thereto, that is
operated by a federally recognized tribe pursuant to federal law, including the
Tribally Controlled Schools Act of 1988, 25 U.S.C. 2501 et seq., is exempt from
the provisions of Subsections A through E of this Section and the rules and
Page 9 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 441 ENROLLED
regulations adopted pursuant to R.S. 17:24.8(E).
(2) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to prohibit a school or
prekindergarten program provided for in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection from
electing to seek or obtain approval by the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education.
G. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a nonpublic
school that operates a prekindergarten program and that does not receive any
state or federal funds from any source, whether directly or indirectly, shall be
exempt from the requirements of Subsection D of this Section.
H. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall adopt
rules in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act as necessary to
implement the provisions of this Section.
Section 2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Board of
Elementary and Secondary Education may adopt emergency rules in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Act.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, the Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 10 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.